Class P/S16.foma
### Sinhala16.foma ###

# Vowels
define A [ ​ද ෙ ];

define C [ ​ප න ් | ප ල ් ල ා | ල ා ];
define B [ න ් න ු |​ න ් | න ් න ෙ ම ි | න ් න ෙ ​ම ු | න ් න ෙ ​හ ි | න ් න ෙ ​හ ු |න ් න ා ​ය | න ් න ේ ​ය | න ් න ෝ ​ය]; 


read lexc SinhalaCP.lexc
define Lexicon;

######### Rewrite rules

define PClass1        [ෙ]  ->  ු || A _   "^" B ;
define PClass2        [ෙ]  ->   ී || A _   "^" C ;


# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassFifGrammar 	Lexicon            .o.
                        PClass1          .o.
                        PClass2          .o.
               	        Cleanup;

regex ClassFifGrammar;
